fr: Type de hop-up: Réglable; Fixe; Aucun; Autre
es: Tipo hop-up: Ajustable; Fijo; Ninguno; Otro
ru: Тип hop-up: Регулируемый; Фиксированный; Отсутствует; Другое
ro-RO: Tip hop-up: Reglabil; Fix; Fără; Altele
pl: Typ hop-up: Regulowany; Stały; Brak; Inny
tr: Hop-up tipi: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit; Yok; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип система за регулиране на траекторията: Регулируем; Фиксиран; Без; Друго
ja: ホップアップタイプ: 調節可能; 固定式; なし; その他
sk-SK: Typ hop-up systému: Nastaviteľný; Fixný; Žiadny; Iné
pt-BR: Hop-up tipo: Ajustável; Fixo; Nenhum; Outros
zh-TW: Hop-up 類型: 可調式; 固定式; 無; 其他
vi: Loại Hop-up: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định; Không có; Khác
zh-CN: 跳弹装置类型: 可调节; 固定; 无; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta hop-up sistema: Nastavljiv; Fiksen; Brez; Drugo
de: Hop-up-Typ: Verstellbar; Fest; Keines; Andere
th: ประเภทฮอปอัพ: ปรับได้; ตายตัว; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
fi: Hop-up-tyyppi: Säädettävä; Kiinteä; Ei mitään; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo Hop-up: Ajustável; Fixo; Nenhum; Outro
lt-LT: Hop-up tipas: Reguliuojamas; Fiksuotas; Nėra; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta hop-up sustava: Podesiv; Fiksni; Bez; Ostalo
ko: 홉업 타입: 조절 가능; 고정형; 없음; 기타
en: Hop-up type: Adjustable; Fixed; None; Other
nb: Type med oppstivet kant: Justerbar; Fast; Ingen; Annet
da: Hop-up-type: Justerbar; Fast; Ingen; Andet
cs: Typ hop-up mechanismu: Nastavitelné; Pevné; Žádné; Jiné
nl: Hop-up type: Verstelbaar; Vast; Geen; Overig
el: Τύπος Hop-up: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Σταθερό; Κανένα; Άλλο
it: Tipo di hop-up: Regolabile; Fisso; Nessuno; Altro
hu: Hop-up típusa: Állítható; Fix; Nincs; Egyéb
sv: Hop-up-typ: Justerbar; Fast; Ingen; Annat